Idaho statutes. Title 39 HEALTH AND SAFETY
Chapter 42
RECREATIONAL VEHICLES AND PARK TRAILERS

Sec.

§ 39-4201. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Park model recreational vehicle” means a vehicle as defined in section 49-117, Idaho Code.

“Recreational vehicle” means a vehicular type unit primarily designed as temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use, which either has its own motive power or is mounted on or drawn by another vehicle. The entities are: travel trailer, camping trailer, truck camper, fifth-wheel trailer, park model recreational vehicle and motor home.

“Camping trailer” means a vehicular portable unit mounted on wheels and constructed with collapsible partial side walls which fold for towing by another vehicle and unfold at the campsite to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping or travel use.

“Fifth-wheel trailer” means a vehicular unit, mounted on wheels, designed to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping or travel use, of such size or weight as not to require special highway movement permits, of gross trailer area not to exceed four hundred (400) square feet in the set-up mode, and designed to be towed by a motorized vehicle that contains a towing mechanism that is mounted above or forward of the tow vehicle’s rear axle.

“Motor home” means a vehicular unit designed to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping or travel use built on or permanently attached to a self-propelled motor vehicle chassis or on a chassis cab or van which is an integral part of the completed vehicle.

“Travel trailer” means a vehicular unit, mounted on wheels, designed to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping or travel use, of such size or weight as not to require special highway movement permits when towed by a motorized vehicle, and of gross trailer area less than three hundred twenty (320) square feet.

“Truck camper” means a portable unit constructed to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping or travel use, consisting of a roof, floor and sides, designed to be loaded onto and unloaded from the bed of a pickup truck.

§ 39-4202. Compliance.

No manufacturer shall sell or offer for sale within this state:

Any new recreational vehicle that is not manufactured in compliance with the National Fire Protection Association (NFPA) 1192 Standard for Recreational Vehicles; or

Any new park model recreational vehicle that is not manufactured in compliance with the American National Standards Institute (ANSI) A119.5 Standards for Recreational Park Trailers.

§ 39-4203. Exemption from local ordinances or regulations.

No recreational vehicle that meets the National Fire Protection Association (NFPA) 1192 Standard for Recreational Vehicles and no park model recreational vehicle that meets the ANSI A119.5 Standard for Recreational Park Trailers shall be required to comply with any local ordinances or regulations adopting standards relating to plumbing, heat producing and electrical systems in recreational vehicles or park model recreational vehicles.